District of Columbia statutes.
3-206

Unlawful acts.

Any person who shall, in the District of Columbia, sell or buy any body aforesaid, or in any way traffic therewith, or transmit or convey any such body to any place outside of said District, or cause or procure any such body to be so transmitted or conveyed, or who shall, in said District, disturb or remove, without legal permit, any body from any grave or vault, shall, on conviction thereof, be fined not more than $200 or imprisoned in the Workhouse of said District for not more than 1 year.

Apr. 29, 1902, 32 Stat. 175, ch. 638, § 6
Buying and selling dead bodies, penalties, see § 22-3303.
1981 Ed., § 2-1406.
1973 Ed., § 2-206.